Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 25

TennCare Fraud and Abuse

71-5-2501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The TennCare Fraud and Abuse Reform Act of 2004”.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-2502. Office of inspector general.

There is created a division of state government which shall be known and designated as the office of inspector general. This division shall be located within the department of finance and administration and shall report directly to the commissioner of finance and administration. The office of inspector general shall be headed by an inspector general. The office of inspector general shall be separate and distinct from the TennCare bureau and the medicaid fraud control unit (MFCU).

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2005, ch. 474, §§ 8, 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-2503. Part definitions.

As used in this part and part 26 unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abuse” shall be given the same meaning as currently exists in federal regulations located at 42 CFR 455.2, with the following exceptions:

It shall also apply to practices by vendors or other persons or entities; and

It shall also apply to the TennCare program;

“Applicant” means any person who has applied for benefits under part 1 of this chapter;

“Benefits” means the health care package of services available to TennCare enrollees;

“Claim” includes any request or demand for money, property, or services made to any employee, officer, or agent of the state, or to any contractor, grantee, or other recipient of state funds, whether under contract or not, if any portion of the money, property, or services requested or demanded issued from, or was provided by, TennCare;

“CMS” (centers for medicare and medicaid services), means the agency within the United States department of health and human services that is responsible for administering Title XVIII (42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.), Title XIX (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), and Title XXI (42 U.S.C. § 1397aa), of the Social Security Act;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of finance and administration;

“Department” means the department of finance and administration;

“Enrollee” means an individual eligible for and enrolled in the TennCare program or in any successor medicaid program in Tennessee;

“Fraud” means an intentional deception or misrepresentation made by a person including, but not limited to, a vendor, recipient, provider, or enrollee, with the knowledge that the deception or misrepresentation could result in some unauthorized benefit or payment to oneself or some other person. It includes any act that constitutes fraud under applicable federal or state law including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, compiled in §§ 71-5-181 — 71-5-185;

“Inspector general” means the person who directs the office of inspector general, who shall report directly to the commissioner of finance and administration;

“Medical assistance” means payment of the cost of care, services and supplies necessary to prevent, diagnose, correct or cure conditions in the person that cause acute suffering, endanger life, result in illness or infirmity, interfere with the person's capacity for normal activity, or threaten some significant disability and which are furnished an eligible person in accordance with the rules, regulations, and statutes governing TennCare. Such care, services and supplies includes services of qualified practitioners licensed under the laws of this state;

“MFCU” means the medicaid fraud control unit;

“Provider” means an institution, facility, agency, person, corporation, partnership, unincorporated organization, nonprofit organization or any person or entity directly or indirectly providing benefits, goods or services to a TennCare enrollee. Provider also means a provider's agent, contractor or subcontractor, such as a billing agent;

“Recipient” means any person who has been determined eligible to receive benefits under part 1 of this chapter, and who has received such benefits;

“TennCare” means the program administered by the single state agency, as designated by the state and CMS, pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), and the Section 1115 research and demonstration waiver granted to the state of Tennessee and any successor programs; and

“Vendor” means any person, institution, agency, other entity or business concern providing services or goods authorized under chapter 5, part 1 of this title, and includes, but is not limited to, any health maintenance organization, managed care organization, managed care contractor, administrative services organization, pharmacy benefit manager, prepaid limited health service organization, contractor or subcontractor.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2005, ch. 474, §§ 8, 16-18; 2011, ch. 47, § 106.

Compiler's Notes. The Section 1115 waiver, referred to in this section, refers to Section 1115 of the Social Security Act, codified in 42 U.S.C. § 1315.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-5-2504. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations, including emergency rules pursuant to §4-5-208, to effectuate the purposes of this part. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-2505. Authority.

The office of inspector general shall have the authority to:

Investigate civil and criminal fraud and abuse of the TennCare program, or any other violations of state criminal law related to the operation of TennCare;

Cooperate with the MFCU, and where a preliminary investigation of fraud and abuse by a provider establishes a sufficient basis to warrant a full investigation, refer such matters to the MFCU;

Refer matters to the appropriate enforcement authority for criminal prosecution;

Refer matters to the appropriate enforcement authorities for civil proceedings, and assist in the recovery of funds which have been inappropriately paid by the TennCare program, including, but not limited to, referral to the attorney general and reporter for civil recovery;

Cooperate with the appropriate federal departments in any reasonable manner as may be necessary to qualify for federal aid in connection with TennCare;

Cooperate with the federal government and other state governments to investigate TennCare and medicaid fraud and abuse;

Cooperate with other state agencies to investigate TennCare and medicaid fraud and abuse;

Within sixty (60) days after the close of each fiscal year, prepare and print a summary report, which shall be submitted to the governor, members of the general assembly, the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare, the TennCare advisory commission, and the commissioner. This report shall include a summary of all activities of the office of inspector general during that fiscal year;

Furnish information to acquaint the public with the fraud and abuse laws pertaining to TennCare;

Contract with necessary entities to carry out the required duties of this part. All such contracts shall be procured in accordance with the requirements of title 12, chapter 4, part 1; and

Exercise any additional powers necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this part.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2005, ch. 474, § 8; 2006, ch. 867, § 8; 2010, ch. 872, § 7; 2011, ch. 410, § 6(g); 2019, ch. 345, § 142.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (8), inserted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare,” preceding “the TennCare advisory commission”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

71-5-2506. Fraud and abuse cases.

The office of inspector general shall have the authority to provide legal assistance to the attorney general and reporter and the state district attorneys general for the purpose of initiating and handling proceedings in appropriate TennCare fraud and abuse cases. Such assistance may include but not be limited to, the authority to fund assistant attorney general or assistant district attorney general positions in those respective offices, subject to the appropriations made to the office of inspector general and the agreement of the offices concerned. The office of inspector general shall also have the authority to fund public defender positions, subject to the appropriations made to the office of inspector general and the agreement of the officers concerned. The office of inspector general may, with reasonable notice, terminate the funding of any attorney positions which the inspector general has funded in either of these offices.

Venue for civil actions involving fraud and abuse shall be in the county where the offense was committed or in Davidson County. Venue for criminal actions involving fraud and abuse shall be to the full extent permitted by the constitution of the state.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2005, ch. 474, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-2507. Enforcement by law enforcement officers.

The staff of the office of inspector general may include law enforcement officers, as defined in § 39-11-106(a) and qualified as defined in § 38-8-106, who have successfully completed a training course approved by the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission, including surveillance training.

Any duly authorized law enforcement officer who has been specifically designated by the inspector general to enforce this part is authorized and empowered to go armed while on active duty engaged in enforcing this part; and is authorized to make arrests for offenses involving criminal fraud and abuse of the TennCare program and any other violations of state criminal law related to the operation of TennCare. Any such person is also authorized and empowered to execute search warrants and do all acts incident thereto in the same manner as search warrants may be executed by sheriffs and other peace officers.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2005, ch. 474, § 8; 2017, ch. 244, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-2508. Medicaid fraud control unit.

There is established a medicaid fraud control unit, which is separate and distinct from the state medicaid agency, within the criminal investigation division of the Tennessee bureau of investigation or within another appropriate agency at the discretion of the governor. As regulated by federal law, the unit is authorized to investigate and refer for prosecution violations of all applicable laws pertaining to provider or vendor fraud and abuse in the administration of the medicaid program, the provision of goods or services or the activities of providers of goods or services under the state medicaid plan; medicare fraud; and abuse or neglect in healthcare facilities receiving payments under the state medicaid plan, such as board and care facilities as allowed by federal law. A summary of the unit's work shall be included in a report which shall be submitted annually to the governor, judiciary committee of the senate, and committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2005, ch. 474, §§ 19, 20; 2013, ch. 236, § 42; 2019, ch. 345, § 143.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “criminal justice committee of the house of representatives”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

71-5-2509. Powers when investigating fraud or abuse — Judicial enforcement.

The office of inspector general, when conducting any investigation relating to TennCare fraud or abuse, shall have the power to issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses, the examination of such witnesses under oath, and the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents relating to such investigation.

In the case of a failure of any person, firm, or corporation so subpoenaed to attend or to produce the specified records, and after reasonable notice to such person, firm, or corporation, the office of inspector general may seek judicial enforcement of the subpoena by filing, through the attorney general and reporter, a petition with the circuit or chancery court of Davidson County or of the judicial district in which such person, firm, or corporation resides. Such petition shall incorporate or be accompanied by a certification regarding the notice given and the failure of such person, firm or corporation to attend or produce the records.

Upon the filing of such a petition in proper form, the court shall order the person, firm, or corporation named in the petition to appear and show cause why they should not comply with the subpoena or be held in contempt for failure to comply. The court shall have authority to employ all judicial power as provided by law to compel compliance with the subpoena, including those powers granted in §§ 29-9-103 — 29-9-106. The court shall be authorized to impose costs and sanctions against any such person, firm, or corporation, in the same manner and on the same bases as may be imposed for failure to comply with judicially issued subpoenas under the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

The court may order the person, firm, or corporation to comply, and shall have the authority to punish each day of failure to comply with such order as a separate contempt of court.

The subpoena enforcement remedies set forth in this subsection (a) shall be cumulative, and not exclusive, of any other remedies provided by law for the enforcement of such subpoenas.

The office of inspector general shall have the power to compel the production of current and former employment records during an investigation. Employment records include, but are not limited to, employment details, wages, and insurance information of TennCare applicants and enrollees. Employment records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied by an office of inspector general representative at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary. The office of inspector general shall also have the right to compare information reported to TennCare by applicants or enrollees with data maintained by the credit bureaus.

The complete patient record of an enrollee or recipient generated during the TennCare enrollment period shall be made available to the office of inspector general upon request. This includes any and all services, goods and pharmaceuticals dispensed regardless of payment source. Access to these records under this section may occur during and after enrollment in the TennCare program. Records accessed during an investigation shall be protected in accordance with state and federal privacy laws.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 20; 2005, ch. 474, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-2510. Investigations of fraud or abuse involving managed care organizations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or of title 38, the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the office of inspector general are authorized to investigate allegations of fraud or abuse involving TennCare managed care organizations.

Acts 2005, ch. 157, § 2.

71-5-2511. Annual reports.

The inspector general shall annually report by October 1 of each year for the prior fiscal year to the governor and the general assembly on the activities of the inspector general's office. The report shall include actual numbers of complaints, investigation, charges, prosecutions, convictions and appeals.

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall annually report to the governor and the general assembly on the activities of the medicaid fraud control unit within the criminal investigation division. The report shall include actual numbers of complaints, investigation, charges, prosecutions, convictions and appeals.

Acts 2005, ch. 157, § 1.

71-5-2512. Cash reward program for reporting criminal fraud by recipients of the TennCare program.

The office of inspector general shall establish an incentive program to provide a cash reward to citizens who notify the office of inspector general of criminal fraud by recipients of the TennCare program. The cash reward shall be paid if the information provided by the citizen results in a criminal conviction. Such cash awards shall be set at a meaningful amount through a schedule to be established by the office of inspector general.

The office of inspector general shall furnish information to acquaint the public with the existence of the program and the means by which citizens may participate.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall use the commissioner's rule-making authority under this chapter to promulgate rules establishing the program mandated by subsection (a).

The office of inspector general shall file with the commerce and labor committee of the senate, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare, by February 15 of each year, an annual report of all moneys paid to citizens pursuant to the program established by this section.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 26; 2013, ch. 236, § 19; 2019, ch. 345, § 144.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “insurance and banking committee of the house of representatives” in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

71-5-2513. Legislative intent.

The general assembly recognizes that data mining is an important tool that should be used for the detection of fraud and abuse in the TennCare program; therefore, it is the intention of the general assembly that:

The office of inspector general shall engage in data mining relating to the receipt of medical assistance and any assistance paid for by TennCare on behalf of recipients, for the purpose of detecting fraud or abuse by recipients;

The inspector general shall have prompt, continuing, and effective access to all such data in a manner that will permit effective data mining for these purposes without imposing unduly burdensome or oppressive requirements on persons or entities that provide medical assistance or any assistance paid for by TennCare; and

Data mining by the office of the inspector general is not intended to alter the requirements under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.), including, but not limited to, the requirements that the single state agency designated to administer the medicaid program must have methods and criteria for identifying suspected fraud cases, must have a method for verifying whether services billed were received, and must cooperate with the state's medicaid fraud control unit.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act, which enacted this part, are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-5-2514. Definitions.

As used in §§71-5-2513 —71-5-2521, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Access” means the ability to extract intelligible information through automated means, and to store, retrieve, use, and otherwise manipulate that information in a way that may lead to meaningful analysis with the aid of commonly available computer software and hardware;

“Data” means representations of information, knowledge, facts, concepts, or instructions that are being prepared or have been prepared in a formalized manner, and are intended to be stored or processed, or are being stored or processed, or have been stored or processed in a computer, computer system, computer network or other electronic medium;

“Data mining” means the automated extraction of predictive information from data for the purpose of finding patterns of behavior and trends or anomalies that may otherwise escape detection, the advanced statistical analysis and modeling of the data to find useful patterns and relationships, and the use of computational techniques involving statistics, machine learning and pattern recognition to analyze the data;

“Single state agency” means the agency of the state of Tennessee that is designated, pursuant to 42 CFR 431.10(b), to administer or supervise the administration of the medicaid program under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.); and

“TennCare related data” means all data that relates to medical assistance or any assistance to TennCare recipients, applicants, or enrollees as defined in this part. The data includes data evidencing identity and eligibility of recipients and the receipt by recipients of medical assistance or any assistance paid for by TennCare.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-5-2515. Data provided to the inspector general.

All persons and entities under contract with the TennCare bureau or its agent or designee, including, but not limited to, all managed care organizations, benefit managers, and other managed care contractors, shall promptly provide to the office of inspector general, on request:

A copy of, or access to, the same data regularly provided to the bureau in the normal course of business, and in the same format, unless otherwise agreed by the inspector general in writing; and

Access to additional TennCare related data or records that may be requested by the inspector general; provided, that, if the data is not easily separated from non-TennCare related data, then all the data shall be provided as necessary to provide meaningful access to the TennCare related data.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-5-2516. Confidentiality — Liability for providing data — Creation of new records or data — Destruction of data.

All records obtained pursuant to this chapter shall be treated as confidential investigative records of the office of inspector general and shall not be open to public inspection; provided, however, that nothing in this part shall be construed to affect the obligation of the single state agency under federal law to provide the medicaid fraud control unit with access to, and free copies of, all records or information or computerized data kept or stored by the agency pursuant to 42 CFR 455.21(a).

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no person shall be subject to any civil or criminal liability for providing the office of inspector general with access to data as required by this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require any person or entity to create new records or data that did not exist at the time of the request; provided, that no person or entity may destroy existing data after having been put on notice that access to the data is required pursuant to this section.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

71-5-2517. Authority to require periodic provision of specific data — Compliance — Format of data — Charge for supplying data — Sufficient dedicated storage space and access to software — Construction.

The office of inspector general is authorized to require periodic provision of specific categories, types, or collations of data without the necessity of issuing a new request at the commencement of each period.

Compliance with a request by the office of inspector general is not dependent on approval by the bureau of TennCare, and it shall not be a defense to an action for enforcement or sanctions under this part that the bureau of TennCare does not require copies of or access to the requested data.

Data kept in the regular course of business in electronic format shall on request be provided to the office of inspector general in the same electronic format. The data shall be provided in a manner that permits meaningful analysis with the aid of commonly available computer software and hardware. To this end, access to data shall be accompanied by access to any existing record layout, field definitions, or other guides or directions associated with the data.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, access to data required pursuant to §§ 71-5-2513 — 71-5-2521 shall be provided to the office of inspector general without charge.

The division of strategic technology solutions shall assist the office of inspector general by providing sufficient dedicated storage space and access to software on the state's computer network to permit the office of inspector general to accomplish the data mining contemplated by §§ 71-5-2513 — 71-5-2521.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent the bureau of TennCare or any other subdivision of the single state agency from conducting data mining, identifying suspected fraud cases, and referring suspected provider fraud to the medicaid fraud control unit pursuant to 42 CFR, Part 455. Nothing in this part shall be construed to affect the obligation of the single state medicaid agency or any of its subdivisions to refer to the medicaid fraud control unit, pursuant to 42 CFR 455, all cases in which the agency has reason to believe, after a preliminary investigation, that an incident of provider fraud or abuse has occurred in the TennCare program.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1; 2020, ch. 690, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (e), substituted “division of strategic technology solutions” for “office of information resources”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 690, § 22. June 11, 2020.

71-5-2518. Rules and regulations.

The inspector general shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as are necessary to implement §§71-5-2513 —71-5-2521. The rules shall be promulgated as emergency rules. The inspector general is designated as the agency person to review initial orders and issue final agency orders pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

71-5-2519. Written petition for objection to providing access to data — Enforcement of obligations.

A person or entity requested to provide access to data pursuant to §§ 71-5-2513 — 71-5-2521 may object to providing all or part of such access by filing a written petition with the inspector general within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice of the request to which objection is made. The petition shall be treated as a contested case pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

In the event a person or entity requested to provide data pursuant to §§ 71-5-2513 — 71-5-2521 fails to do so or to file a timely petition objecting to provision of the data, the office of inspector general has the authority to petition the chancery court of Davidson County through the attorney general and reporter, or by special appointment or delegation from the attorney general and reporter as provided by law, for enforcement of the obligations imposed by this chapter, and for recovery of costs, attorney's fees, and any applicable civil penalties.

Upon filing of a petition for enforcement by the inspector general, the court shall order the person or entity named in the petition to show cause why they should not be held in contempt for failure to comply with the request.

In ruling on the petition, the court shall be authorized to:

Order the person or entity, on pain of contempt, to comply with the request, and to punish each day of failure to comply with the order as a separate contempt of court; and

Award to the attorney general and reporter and, if applicable, the office of inspector general, reasonable costs and attorney's fees incurred in enforcing the requirement, if the state prevails.

Willful failure to provide data, or access to data, as required by this chapter, shall be subject to the same civil penalty established by law for willful failure to report recipient fraud to the inspector general.

A person or entity that has been assessed a civil penalty by the office of inspector general may object to the penalty by filing a written petition with the inspector general within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice of the assessment. The petition shall be treated as a contested case pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

In the event that a person or entity that has been assessed a civil penalty by the office of inspector general has failed to pay the penalty or file a timely objection, the office of inspector general has the authority to file a petition in the chancery court of Davidson County through the attorney general and reporter, or by delegation from the attorney general and reporter as provided by law, for the collection of the penalty, and for enforcement of the request to provide access to data.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-5-2520. Collections of penalties, fees and costs.

All funds collected as civil penalties, attorney's fees, costs, or costs of investigation by the inspector general, pursuant to this part or part 26, shall be deposited by the state treasurer in a separate account exclusively for the use of that office to defray the expenses of continued operations involving recipient fraud and abuse, including, but not limited to, data mining, litigation, criminal investigation and prosecution, civil and administrative recovery, undercover operations involving recipient fraud, and training and equipment for employees; provided, that no part of the funds shall be used to supplement salaries of any public employee or law enforcement officer.

Funds collected pursuant to §§ 71-5-2513 — 71-5-2521 may not supplant other state funds or appropriations. Any fund balance remaining unexpended at the end of a fiscal year in the account shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. No part of the fund shall be diverted to the general fund or any other public fund.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-5-2521. Report.

The office of inspector general shall include in its annual report information on the progress of its data mining efforts, including any difficulties encountered in obtaining access to data from either private or government entities, and suggestions for legislative or other solutions.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.